Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 14

Adult-Oriented Establishments

7-51-1401. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adult” means a person who has attained eighteen (18) years of age;

“Adult cabaret” means a cabaret that features topless dancers, go-go dancers, exotic dancers, strippers, male or female impersonators, or similar entertainers;

“Adult entertainment” means any exhibition of any adult-oriented motion picture, live performance, display or dance of any type, that has as a significant or substantial portion of such performance, any actual or simulated performance of specified sexual activities, including removal of articles of clothing or appearing unclothed;

“Adult-oriented establishment” means any commercial establishment, business or service, or portion thereof, that offers, as its principal or predominant stock or trade, sexually-oriented material, devices, or paraphernalia or specified sexual activities, or any combination or form thereof, whether printed, filmed, recorded or live and that restricts or purports to restrict admission to adults or to any class of adults. “Adult-oriented establishment” includes, but is not limited to:

“Adult book stores” means any corporation, partnership or business of any kind that has as its principal or predominant stock or trade, books, magazines or other periodicals and that offers, sells, provides or rents for a fee:

Is available for viewing by patrons on the premises by means of the operation of movie machines or slide projectors; or

Has a substantial portion of its contents devoted to the pictorial depiction of sadism, masochism or bestiality; or

Has as its principal theme the depiction of sexual activity by, or lascivious exhibition of, the uncovered genitals, pubic region or buttocks of children who are or appear to be under eighteen (18) years of age;

“Adult motion picture theatres” means an enclosed building used for presenting film presentations that are distinguished or characterized by an emphasis on matter depicting, describing or relating to specified sexual activities for observation by patrons therein; and

“Adult shows” or “adult peep shows” means all adult shows, exhibitions, performances or presentations that contain acts or depictions of specified sexual activities;

“Bestiality” means sexual activity, actual or simulated, between a human being and an animal;

“Family recreation center” means any facility, which is oriented principally toward meeting the athletic or recreational needs of families and whose targeted customer is a minor child, including, but not limited to, the provision of one (1) or more of the following:

Ice skating;

Roller skating;

Skateboarding;

Paintball;

Mini-golf;

Bowling;

Go-carts;

Climbing facilities;

Athletic fields or courts; or

Other similar athletic or recreation activities;

“Masochism” means sexual gratification achieved by a person through, or the association of sexual activity with, submission or subjection to physical pain, suffering, humiliation, torture or death;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, limited partnership, firm, corporation or association;

“Sadism” means sexual gratification achieved through, or the association of sexual activity with, the infliction of physical pain, suffering, humiliation, torture or death upon another person or animal;

“Sexually-oriented material” means any book, article, magazine, publication or written matter of any kind, drawing, etching, painting, photograph, motion picture film or sound recording that depicts sexual activity, actual or simulated, involving human beings or human beings and animals, that exhibits uncovered human genitals or pubic region in a lewd or lascivious manner, or that exhibits human male genitals in a discernibly turgid state, even if completely covered; and

“Specified sexual activities” means activities, services or performances that include the following sexual activities or the exhibition of the following anatomical areas:

Human genitals in a state of sexual stimulation or arousal;

Acts of human masturbation, sexual intercourse, sodomy, cunnilingus, fellatio or any excretory function, or representation thereof; or

Fondling or erotic touching of human genitals, pubic region, buttocks or female breasts.

Acts 1995, ch. 421, § 2; 2012, ch. 1062, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning certain regulations on a state-wide basis concerning hours of operation, prohibited acts, and permitting regulations for employees and entertainers of adult-oriented establishments and adult cabarets, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 1062.

Cross-References. Registration of adult-oriented establishments, title 7, ch. 51, part 11.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of state legislature to regulate adult-oriented establishments, OAG 98-096, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (4/29/98).

7-51-1402. Hours of operation for adult-oriented establishment.

No adult-oriented establishment shall open to do business before eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.), Monday through Saturday; and no such establishment shall remain open after twelve o'clock (12:00) midnight, Monday through Saturday. No adult-oriented establishment shall be open for business on any Sunday or a legal holiday as designated in § 15-1-101.

A local ordinance, resolution or private act may establish opening hours for adult-oriented establishments that are later than eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) and closing hours that are earlier than twelve o'clock (12:00) midnight, but in no event may such ordinances, resolutions or private acts extend the opening hours to earlier than eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) or the closing hours to later than twelve o'clock (12:00) midnight.

Acts 1995, ch. 421, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. When an adult-oriented establishment is offering lap, couch, table, and other non-stage adult entertainment in close proximity to patrons, it is not within the scope of the exemption in T.C.A. §7-51-1405 and must comply with the hours of operation restrictions in T.C.A.§7-51-1402, OAG 08-170 (11/5/08), 2008 Tenn. AG LEXIS 192.

Current precedent in the United States Court of Appeals for the Sixth Circuit upholds the constitutionality of Tennessee's hours-of-operation restrictions for adult-oriented establishments. OAG 14-92, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 95 (10/24/14).

7-51-1403. Physical design of premises.

No person shall own, operate, manage, rent, lease or exercise control over any commercial building, structure, premises or portion or part of any commercial building, structure or premises that is an adult-oriented establishment and that contains:

Partitions between subdivisions of a room, portion or part of a building, structure or premises having an aperture that is designed or constructed to facilitate sexual activity between persons on either side of the partition; or

Booths, stalls, or partitioned portions of a room or individual rooms, used for the viewing of motion pictures or other forms of entertainment, having doors, curtains or portal partitions, unless such booths, stalls, partitioned portions of a room or individual rooms so used shall have at least one (1) side open to adjacent public rooms so that the area inside is visible to persons in adjacent public rooms. Such areas shall be lighted in a manner that the persons in the areas used for viewing motion pictures or other forms of entertainment are visible from the adjacent public rooms, but such lighting shall not be of such intensity as to prevent the viewing of motion pictures or other offered entertainment.

Acts 1995, ch. 421, § 4.

7-51-1404. Penalty.

A first offense for a violation of this part is a Class B misdemeanor, punishable only by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500); and a second or subsequent such offense is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1995, ch. 421, § 5.

Cross-References. Penalties for Class A and B misdemeanors, §40-35-111.

7-51-1405. Hours of operation for live, stage adult entertainment.

The opening and closing time limitations placed on adult-oriented establishments in §7-51-1402 shall not apply to an establishment or the portion of an establishment that offers only live, stage adult entertainment in a theatre, adult cabaret, or dinner show type setting.

Acts 1995, ch. 421, § 6.

Attorney General Opinions. When an adult-oriented establishment is offering lap, couch, table, and other non-stage adult entertainment in close proximity to patrons, it is not within the scope of the exemption in T.C.A. §7-51-1405 and must comply with the hours of operation restrictions in T.C.A.§7-51-1402, OAG 08-170 (11/5/08), 2008 Tenn. AG LEXIS 192.

7-51-1406. Local laws not preempted.

Nothing in this part shall preempt an ordinance, regulation, restriction or license that was lawfully adopted or issued by a political subdivision prior to the enactment of Acts 2007, ch. 541, or prevent or preempt a political subdivision in this state from enacting and enforcing in the future other lawful and reasonable restrictions, regulations, licensing, zoning or other civil or administrative provisions concerning the location, configuration, code compliance or other business operations or requirements of adult-oriented establishments and sexually-oriented businesses.

Acts 1995, ch. 421, § 7; 2007, ch. 541, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding adult oriented businesses, please refer to Acts 2007, ch. 541.

7-51-1407. Restrictions on locations of adult-oriented businesses.

An adult-oriented establishment or adult cabaret shall not locate within one thousand feet (1,000') of a child care facility, a private, public, or charter school, a public park, family recreation center, a residence, or a place of worship.

For the purposes of subdivision (a)(1), measurements shall be made in a straight line in all directions, without regard to intervening structures or objects, from the nearest point on the property line of a parcel containing an adult-oriented establishment to the nearest point on the property line of a parcel containing a child care facility, a private, public, or charter school, a public park, family recreation center, a residence, or a place of worship.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to an adult-oriented business located in an otherwise prohibited location in operation on July 1, 2007, and the business activity shall be deemed an existing use of the property; provided, that the business remains in continuous operation as an adult-oriented business regardless of change of ownership.

Acts 2007, ch. 541, § 1; 2012, ch. 1062, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding adult oriented businesses, please refer to Acts 2007, ch. 541.

For the preamble to the act concerning certain regulations on a state-wide basis concerning hours of operation, prohibited acts, and permitting regulations for employees and entertainers of adult-oriented establishments and adult cabarets, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 1062.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of 1000 foot buffer for adult-oriented establishments, OAG 07-080 (5/24/07), 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 80.